Rhode Island statutes. Title 11 Criminal Offenses
Chapter 47 Weapons

11-47-1.
Short title.

This chapter may be cited as the “Firearms Act”.

History of Section.

P.L. 1927, ch. 1052, § 20; G.L. 1938, ch. 404, § 20; G.L. 1956, §

11-47-1

; P.L. 1959, ch. 75, § 1.

11-47-2.
Definitions.

When used in this chapter, the following words and phrases are construed as follows:

“3D printing process” means 3D printing or additive manufacturing which is a process of making three (3) dimensional solid objects from a computer file and shall include any of various processes in which material is joined or solidified under computer control to create a three (3) dimensional object, with material being added together including liquid molecules or powder grains.

“Antique firearm” is defined as that term is defined under the provisions of 18 U.S.C. § 921.

“Binary trigger” means a device that replaces a standard trigger on a semi-automatic weapon and is designed to fire one round on the pull of the trigger and another round upon release of the trigger.

“Bump-fire stock” means any device that replaces a semi-automatic weapon’s standard stock and is designed to slide back and forth rapidly, harnessing the weapon’s recoil to rapidly fire the weapon.

“Crime of violence” means and includes any of the following crimes or an attempt to commit any of them: murder, manslaughter, rape, first- or second-degree sexual assault, first- or second-degree child molestation, kidnapping, first- and second-degree arson, mayhem, robbery, burglary, breaking and entering, any felony violation involving the illegal manufacture, sale, or delivery of a controlled substance, or possession with intent to manufacture, sell, or deliver a controlled substance classified in schedule I or schedule II of §

21-28-2.08

, any violation of §

21-28-4.01.1

or §

21-28-4.01.2

or conspiracy to commit any violation of these statutes, assault with a dangerous weapon, assault or battery involving grave bodily injury, or assault with intent to commit any offense punishable as a felony; upon any conviction of an offense punishable as a felony offense under §

12-29-5

.

“Firearm” includes any machine gun, pistol, rifle, air rifle, air pistol, “blank gun,” “BB gun,” or other instrument from which steel or metal projectiles are propelled, or that may readily be converted to expel a projectile, except crossbows, recurve, compound, or longbows, and except instruments propelling projectiles that are designed or normally used for a primary purpose other than as a weapon. The frame or receiver of the weapon shall be construed as a firearm under the provisions of this section.

“Fugitive from justice” means any person who has fled from any state, territory, the District of Columbia, or possession of the United States to avoid prosecution for a crime of violence or to avoid giving testimony in any criminal proceeding.

“Ghost gun” means a firearm, including a frame or receiver, that lacks a unique serial number engraved or cased in metal alloy on the frame or receiver by a licensed manufacturer, maker, or importer under federal law or markings in accordance with 27 C.F.R. § 479.102. It does not include a firearm that has been rendered permanently inoperable, or a firearm that is not required to have a serial number in accordance with the federal Gun Control Act of 1968.

“Licensing authorities” means the board of police commissioners of a city or town where the board has been instituted, the chief of police or superintendent of police of other cities and towns having a regular organized police force, and, in towns where there is no chief of police or superintendent of police, it means the town clerk who may issue licenses upon the recommendation of the town sergeant, and it also means any other person or body duly authorized by the city or town charter or by state law.

“Machine gun” means any weapon that shoots, is designed to shoot, or can be readily restored to shoot automatically more than one shot, without manual reloading, by a single function of the trigger. The term also includes the frame or receiver of the weapon, any combination of parts designed and intended for use in converting a weapon into a machine gun, and any combination of parts from which a machine gun can be assembled if the parts are in the possession or under the control of a person.

“Major component” means, with respect to a firearm:

The slide or cylinder or the frame or receiver of the firearm; and

In the case of a rifle or shotgun, includes the barrel of the firearm.

“Person” includes an individual, partnership, firm, association, or corporation.

“Pistol” includes any pistol or revolver, and any shotgun, rifle, or similar weapon with overall length less than twenty-six inches (26"), but does not include any pistol or revolver designed for the use of blank cartridges only.

“Rifle” shall have the same meaning as in 26 U.S.C. § 5845(c), and by barrel length and overall length not be subject to registration pursuant to the National Firearms Act, 26 U.S.C. ch. 53 (prior § 5801 et seq.).

“Sawed-off rifle” means any rifle with overall length of less than twenty-six inches (26") or barrel length of less than sixteen inches (16").

“Sawed-off shotgun” means any shotgun with overall length of less than twenty-six inches (26") or barrel length of less than eighteen inches (18").

“Sell” includes let or hire, give, lend, and transfer, and “purchase” includes hire, accept, and borrow, and “purchasing” shall be construed accordingly.

“Shotgun” shall have the same meaning as in 26 U.S.C. § 5845(d), and by barrel length and overall length not be subject to registration pursuant to the National Firearms Act, 26 U.S.C. ch. 53 (prior § 5801 et seq.).

“Trigger crank” means a trigger actuator that attaches to the trigger of a semi-automatic weapon and causes the weapon to fire by turning the crank handle.

“Undetectable firearm” means any firearm that:

After removal of all parts, other than a major component, is not as detectable by walk-through metal detectors commonly used at airports or other public buildings; or

Any major component of which, if subjected to inspection by the types of detection devices commonly used at airports or other public buildings for security screening, would not generate an image that accurately depicts the shape of the component; or

Is manufactured wholly of plastic, fiberglass, or through a 3D printing process; or

Upon which the frame or receiver lacks a unique serial number engraved or cased into on the frame or receiver by a licensed manufacturer, maker, or importer under federal law, or markings in accordance with 27 C.F.R. § 479.102. Provided, however, this subsection shall not apply to any firearm rendered permanently inoperable or a firearm manufactured prior to 1968.

History of Section.

P.L. 1927, ch. 1052, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 404, § 1; P.L. 1950, ch. 2452, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

11-47-2

; P.L. 1959, ch. 75, § 1; P.L. 1974, ch. 184, § 1; P.L. 1975, ch. 278, § 1; P.L. 1988, ch. 660, § 1; P.L. 1989, ch. 542, § 7; P.L. 1991, ch. 333, § 1; P.L. 1995, ch. 153, § 1; P.L. 1996, ch. 275, § 1; P.L. 2012, ch. 213, § 1; P.L. 2012, ch. 232, § 1; P.L. 2018, ch. 5, § 1; P.L. 2018, ch. 8, § 1; P.L. 2020, ch. 9, § 1; P.L. 2020, ch. 10, § 1; P.L. 2022, ch. 133, § 1, effective June 21, 2022; P.L. 2022, ch. 134, § 1, effective June 21, 2022.

11-47-3.
Carrying dangerous weapons or substances when committing crime of violence.

No person shall commit or attempt to commit a crime of violence when armed with or having available any firearm, explosive substance, noxious liquid, gas or substance, or acid. Every person violating the provisions of this section shall be punished: (1) for the first conviction by imprisonment for not less than three (3) nor more than ten (10) years; (2) for a second conviction under this section by imprisonment for not less than ten (10) nor more than twenty (20) years; and (3) for a third or subsequent conviction the person convicted shall be sentenced to not less than fifteen (15) years to life imprisonment. For the penalties provided in this section he or she shall not be afforded the provisions of suspension or deferment of sentence, nor of probation.

History of Section.

P.L. 1927, ch. 1052, § 2; G.L. 1938, ch. 404, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

11-47-3

; P.L. 1959, ch. 75, § 1; P.L. 1968, ch. 183, § 1; P.L. 1977, ch. 16, § 1; P.L. 1989, ch. 544, § 1.

11-47-3.1.
Carrying a stolen firearm when committing a crime of violence.

No person shall commit a crime of violence when armed with or having available a stolen firearm. Every person violating the provisions of this section shall be punished: (1) for the first conviction by imprisonment for not less than five (5) nor more than fifteen (15) years; (2) for a second conviction under this section by imprisonment for not less than fifteen (15) nor more than twenty (20) years; and (3) for a third or subsequent conviction under this section by imprisonment for not less than twenty (20) years and may be imprisoned for life. The sentence imposed shall be consecutive to the underlying sentence for the crime of violence.

History of Section.

P.L. 1992, ch. 438, § 1; P.L. 2013, ch. 455, § 1; P.L. 2013, ch. 464, § 1.

11-47-3.2.
Using a firearm when committing a crime of violence.

No person shall use a firearm while committing or attempting to commit a crime of violence. Every person violating the provisions of this section shall be punished: (1) for the first offense by imprisonment for ten (10) years; however, if the violation was committed by use of a machine gun as defined in §

11-47-2(10)

, the term of imprisonment shall be thirty (30) years; (2) for a second conviction under this section by imprisonment for twenty (20) years; however, if the violation was committed by use of a machine gun as defined in §

11-47-2(10)

, the term of imprisonment shall be life; and (3) for a third or subsequent conviction, the person shall be sentenced to life, or life without the possibility of parole by the sentencing judge after consideration of aggravating and mitigating circumstances contained in §§

12-19.2-3

and

12-19.2-4

. Any sentence imposed upon a person pursuant to this section shall be imposed consecutively to and not concurrently with any sentence imposed for the underlying crime or attempted crime, and the person shall not be afforded the benefits of deferment of sentence or parole; provided, that unless sentenced to life without the possibility of parole pursuant to subdivision (3) of this subsection, a person sentenced to life under this section may be granted parole.

Every person who, while committing an offense violating subsection (a) of this section, discharges a firearm shall be guilty of a felony and be imprisoned as follows:

Ten (10) years, if no injury to any other person results from the discharge;

Twenty (20) years, if a person other than a police officer is injured by the discharge of the firearm, or if a police officer who is engaged in the performance of his or her duty is deliberately endangered by the person’s discharge of the firearm;

Life, if a police officer who is engaged in the performance of his or her duty is injured by the discharge of the firearm; and

Life, if the death or permanent incapacity of any person (other than the person convicted) results from the discharge of the firearm; provided that, involuntary manslaughter shall not be considered a “crime of violence” for the purpose of subdivision (b)(4) only.

The penalties defined in subsection (b) of this section shall run consecutively, and not concurrently, to any other sentence imposed and, notwithstanding the provisions of chapter 8 of title 13, the person shall not be afforded the benefits of deferment of sentence or parole; provided, that a person sentenced to life under subdivision (b)(3) or (b)(4) of this section may be granted parole.

History of Section.

P.L. 2000, ch. 158, § 2; P.L. 2000, ch. 285, § 2; P.L. 2012, ch. 216, § 1; P.L. 2012, ch. 230, § 1.

11-47-4.
Being armed prima facie evidence of intention.

In the trial of a person for committing or attempting to commit a crime of violence, the fact that he or she was armed with or had available a pistol or revolver without license to carry it, or was armed with or had available a machine gun, shall be prima facie evidence of his or her intention to commit the crime of violence.

History of Section.

P.L. 1927, ch. 1052, § 2; G.L. 1938, ch. 404, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

11-47-3

; G.L., §

11-47-4

; P.L. 1959, ch. 75, § 1.

11-47-5.
Possession of firearms by certain persons prohibited.

No person shall purchase, own, carry, transport, or have in his or her possession any firearm if that person:

Has been convicted in this state or elsewhere of a crime of violence;

Is a fugitive from justice;

Has, in this state or elsewhere, entered a plea of nolo contendere to or been convicted of an offense punishable as a felony under §

12-29-5

; or

Has, in this state or elsewhere, entered a plea of nolo contendere to or been convicted of any of the following offenses punishable as a misdemeanor under §

12-29-5

:

Simple assault (§

11-5-3

);

Cyberstalking and cyberharassment (§

11-52-4.2

);

Violation of a protective order (as set forth in §

12-29-2(a)(10)

; or

Disorderly conduct (§

11-45-1

).

A disorderly conduct conviction shall result in prohibition under this section if and only if the offense involves the use or attempted use of force or the threatened use of a dangerous weapon.

The provisions of this subsection shall apply to all persons who enter a plea of nolo contendere to or have been convicted of any of the offenses specified in subsections (a)(3) and (a)(4) of this section, unless and until that person’s matter has been expunged, or upon the completion of the sentence of a one-year filing, or the end of a one-year probationary period that no longer constitutes a conviction pursuant to §

12-18-3

.

No person shall purchase, carry, transport, or have in his or her possession any firearm if that person is subject to an order issued pursuant to chapter 15 of title 15, chapter 8.1 of title 8, or an equivalent order in this state or elsewhere, which order was issued after the person restrained has received notice of the proceedings and had an opportunity to be heard.

No person who is in community confinement pursuant to the provisions of §

42-56-20.2

, or who is otherwise subject to electronic surveillance or monitoring devices as a condition of parole, shall purchase, carry, transport, or have in his or her possession any firearm. This subsection shall not apply to any person who has not been convicted of (or pleaded guilty or nolo contendere to) a crime of violence in a court of competent jurisdiction.

Every person violating the provisions of this section shall, upon conviction, be punished by imprisonment for not less than two (2) nor more than ten (10) years; and for penalties provided in this section he or she shall not be afforded the benefit of suspension or deferment of sentence nor of probation.

History of Section.

P.L. 1927, ch. 1052, § 3; G.L. 1938, ch. 404, § 3; G.L. 1956, §

11-47-4

; G.L., §

11-47-5

, as enacted by P.L. 1959, ch. 75, § 1; P.L. 1968, ch. 183, § 2; P.L. 1995, ch. 50, § 1; P.L. 1996, ch. 275, § 1; P.L. 2017, ch. 374, § 2; P.L. 2017, ch. 385, § 2.

11-47-5.1.
Larceny of a firearm.

Every person who shall steal any firearm shall be deemed guilty of larceny. “Firearm”, as utilized in this section only, shall not apply to an air rifle, air pistol, “blank gun,” or “BB gun.” Every person violating the provisions of this section shall be sentenced, upon conviction, to not less than one year nor more than ten (10) years.

No person shall steal any firearm as defined in this section and then sell, lend, or transfer the firearm or firearms. Any person convicted of violating the provisions of this subsection shall be punished by imprisonment for not less than ten (10) years nor more than twenty (20) years, and the sentence shall be consecutive to any other sentence he or she may receive or is serving.

History of Section.

P.L. 1975, ch. 278, § 2; P.L. 1990, ch. 278, § 1; P.L. 2000, ch. 158, § 1; P.L. 2000, ch. 285, § 1.

11-47-5.2.
Possession of a stolen firearm.

It shall be unlawful for any person to possess a stolen firearm, knowing it to be stolen. Any person in violation of this section shall be guilty of a felony and subject to imprisonment for not less than three (3) years nor more than fifteen (15) years.

History of Section.

P.L. 2013, ch. 455, § 2; P.L. 2013, ch. 464, § 2.

11-47-5.3.
Surrender of firearms by persons convicted of domestic violence offenses.

Pleading nolo contendere to or conviction of an offense under §

12-29-2

which is punishable as a felony shall prohibit the defendant from purchasing, owning, carrying, transporting, or having in their possession or control any firearm. Upon such a plea or conviction, the court shall issue an order declaring that the defendant surrender all firearm(s) owned by the defendant, or in the defendant’s possession, care, custody, or control as described in this section.

Surrender shall be made within twenty-four (24) hours of prohibition to a law enforcement agency or to a federally licensed firearms dealer. The arresting law enforcement agency shall be immediately notified of the order to surrender firearm(s). A law enforcement agency or federally licensed firearms dealer taking possession of a firearm(s) shall issue proof of surrender to the person surrendering the firearm(s). The proof of surrender shall include the name of the person; the name of the law enforcement agency or federally licensed firearms dealer; the date of surrender; the serial number; the manufacturer; and model of all surrendered firearm(s).

The defendant may transport their firearm(s) during the twenty-four hour (24) surrender period directly to the law enforcement agency or federally licensed firearms dealer, provided that the firearm(s) is broken down, unloaded, and carried as openly as circumstances will permit, or provided that the pistols or revolvers are unloaded and secured in a separate container suitable for the purpose.

The defendant shall, within forty-eight (48) hours after being served with the order, either:

File a copy of proof of surrender with the court and attest that all firearm(s) owned by the defendant, or in the defendant’s possession, care, custody, or control at the time of the plea or conviction, have been surrendered in accordance with this section and that the defendant currently owns no firearm(s) or has any firearm(s) in their care, custody, or control; or

Attest that, at the time of the plea or conviction, the defendant owned no firearm(s) and had no firearm(s) in their care, custody, or control, and that the defendant currently owns no firearm(s) and has no firearm(s) in their possession, care, custody, or control.

The list of firearm(s) surrendered shall be kept under seal and shall not be part of the public record.

If the defendant chooses to surrender a firearm(s) to a law enforcement agency, the law enforcement agency shall follow the policies established by the police officer’s commission on standards and training for the return or disposal of the firearm(s).

The police officer’s commission on standards and training shall establish policies for the return or disposal of firearms that are surrendered pursuant to any court order, provided that such policies require that the defendant be notified of the return or disposal, and that the owner receive any financial value received from the disposal, less the cost associated with taking possession of, storing, and disposing of the firearm(s) and provided that no disposal shall occur while any appeal of the conviction is pending.

If the defendant, or their designee, transfers a firearm(s) to a federally licensed firearms dealer pursuant to this section, the defendant may instruct the federally licensed firearms dealer to sell the firearm(s) or to transfer ownership pursuant to state and federal law to a qualified named individual who is not a member of the defendant’s dwelling house. The owner of any firearm(s) sold shall receive any financial value received from their sale, less the cost associated with taking possession of, storing, and transferring of the firearm(s).

Every individual, to whom ownership of a firearm(s) is transferred pursuant to this section, shall be prohibited from transferring or returning any firearm(s) to the defendant and shall be informed of this prohibition.

(i) Any knowing violation of subsection (a)(7) of this section is a felony which shall be punishable by a fine of not more than one thousand dollars ($1,000), or by imprisonment for a term of not less than one year and not more than five (5) years, or both.

History of Section.

P.L. 2016, ch. 212, § 1; P.L. 2016, ch. 214, § 1.

11-47-5.4.
Surrender of firearms after domestic violence offenses.

A plea of nolo contendere, resulting in a filing or probation or conviction shall prohibit the defendant from purchasing, carrying, transporting, or having in his or her possession any firearm. Upon such a plea or conviction, the court shall order the defendant to surrender all firearms owned by the person or in the person’s possession as described in this section.

Surrender shall be made within twenty-four (24) hours of prohibition to the Rhode Island state police or local law enforcement or to a licensed gun dealer. The arresting law enforcement agency shall be immediately notified by the court of the order to surrender firearms. A law enforcement agency or licensed gun dealer taking possession of a firearm shall issue a proof of surrender to the person surrendering the firearm. The proof of surrender must include the name of the person, the date of surrender, and the serial number, manufacturer, and model of all surrendered firearms.

A defendant transporting a firearm to surrender in accordance with this section shall not be liable to prosecution under §§

11-47-5(d)

or

11-47-8

.

The defendant shall, within forty-eight (48) hours after being served with the order, either:

File a copy of proof of surrender with the court of jurisdiction, and attest that all firearms owned by the person or in the person’s possession at the time of plea or conviction have been surrendered in accordance with this section and that the person currently owns no firearms and has no firearms in his or her possession; or

Attest that, at the time of plea or conviction, the person owned no firearms and had no firearms in their possession, and that the person currently owns no firearms and has no firearms in his or her possession.

The court of jurisdiction’s copy of proof of surrender shall be kept under seal and shall not be part of the public record.

The Rhode Island state police are authorized to develop rules, regulations and procedures pertaining to the storage of firearms that are surrendered pursuant to this section. The Rhode Island state police may consult with the Rhode Island Police Chiefs’ Association in developing rules and procedures. Law enforcement agencies and departments shall observe due care in the receipt and storage of any firearm surrendered pursuant to this section. No law enforcement agency shall dispose of any firearm surrendered pursuant to this section unless that firearm is abandoned as provided in this section. The Rhode Island state police may consult with the Rhode Island Police Chiefs’ Association in developing rules and procedures.

A firearm surrendered to the Rhode Island state police or a local police department under this section shall be deemed abandoned if:

Six (6) years have passed from the date of the completion of the defendant’s sentence for an offense enumerated in §

11-47-5(a)(4)

; and

During the two (2) years following the six-year (6) period described in subsection (a)(6)(i) of this section, the Rhode Island state police or local police department has provided notice to the defendant, on at least two (2) separate occasions, that if the firearm is not reclaimed it shall be disposed of; and

After the two-year (2) period described in subsection (a)(6)(ii) of this section and after notice to the defendant, the defendant fails to reclaim the firearm.

The Rhode Island state police may dispose of an abandoned firearm at any time, provided that no disposal shall occur while any appeal of the conviction for a crime enumerated in §

11-47-5(a)(4)

is pending and provided that the owner of the firearm receives any financial value generated from its disposal less the cost associated with disposing of the firearm.

History of Section.

P.L. 2017, ch. 374, § 3; P.L. 2017, ch. 385, § 3.

11-47-5.5.
Motion to lift firearms prohibition for persons convicted of specified misdemeanor domestic violence offenses — Consecutive prohibitions — Return of surrendered firearms.

A person prohibited from purchasing, owning, carrying, transporting, or having in their possession any firearm solely because of a plea of nolo contendere to or a conviction of an offense enumerated in §

11-47-5(a)(4)

may file a motion in the district court to have that firearm prohibition lifted in accordance with this section. A person who is otherwise prohibited under state law from purchasing, owning, carrying, transporting, or having in their possession any firearm shall not be eligible for relief under this section.

Except for those cases where the defendant is eligible to reclaim firearms after the one year completion of a filing or probation under §

12-18-3

, a person shall become eligible to file a motion seeking relief under this section after five (5) years from the date of the completion of his or her sentence, unless, during that five (5)-year period, the person enters a plea of nolo contendere to or is convicted of any new offense enumerated in §

11-47-5(a)(4)

.

A person already prohibited from purchasing, owning, carrying, transporting, or having in their possession any firearm under §

11-47-5(a)(4)

who pleads nolo contendere to or is convicted of any new offense enumerated in § 11-47-5(a)(4) shall be subject to an additional six (6)-year firearm prohibition under § 11-47-5(a)(4). That additional prohibition shall run consecutively to the prohibition already in effect at the time the person pleaded nolo contendere to or was convicted of the new offense.

A person made subject to consecutive firearms prohibitions in accordance with this subsection shall not become eligible to file a motion seeking relief under this section until their consecutive prohibition periods have fully elapsed.

No filing fee shall be charged for the filing of a motion seeking relief under this section.

The district court shall schedule a hearing on a motion seeking relief under this section no later than thirty (30) days from the date the motion is filed.

The district court shall only consider whether the required amount of time to retrieve the firearms has expired, and that no other legal prohibition exists to prevent the respondent from recovering his or her firearms. If the court lifts a person’s firearm prohibition pursuant to this section, the court shall issue the person written notice that the person is no longer prohibited from purchasing, owning, carrying, transporting, or having in his or her possession any firearm under §

11-47-5(a)(4)

.

A firearm surrendered to the Rhode Island state police or a local police department by a person formerly prohibited under §

11-47-5(a)(4)

who is granted relief under this section shall be returned to the person upon his or her request when:

The person formerly prohibited under §

11-47-5(a)(4)

provides written proof issued by the court indicating that the firearm prohibition has been lifted pursuant to this section; and

The Rhode Island state police or a local police department determines that the person formerly prohibited under § 11-47-5(a)(4) is not otherwise prohibited from possessing a firearm under state or federal law.

A court’s grant of relief pursuant to this section shall not constitute an expungement, nor shall it in any way impact, negate, or otherwise modify the person’s prior conviction of an offense enumerated in §

11-47-5(a)(4)

.

History of Section.

P.L. 2017, ch. 374, § 6; P.L. 2017, ch. 385, § 6.

11-47-6.
Mental incompetents and drug addicts prohibited from possession of firearms.

No person who is under guardianship or treatment or confinement by virtue of being a mental incompetent, or who has been adjudicated or is under treatment or confinement as a drug addict, shall purchase, own, carry, transport, or have in his or her possession or under his or her control any firearm. Any person affected by the provisions of this section, other than a person who has been pronounced criminally insane by competent medical authority, after the lapse of a period of five (5) years from the date of being pronounced cured by competent medical authority, may, upon presentation of an affidavit issued by competent medical authority to the effect that he or she is a mentally stable person and a proper person to possess firearms, make application for the purchase of the firearm(s). Any person affected by the provisions of this section, in making application for the purchase of firearms and in executing the application, voluntarily waives his or her right to refuse or refrain from disclosing any confidential information, including, but not limited to, any information arising from the physician-patient relationship, pertinent to a determination by the proper authorities regarding the approval or disapproval of this application. Any person affected by the provisions of this section, in making application for the purchase of firearms and in executing the application, further agrees to allow the proper authorities to investigate any and all medical records of the applicant pertinent to a determination by the authorities regarding the approval or disapproval of this application. In the event that the application is approved, and if the person has no other disqualifying record, he or she will be allowed to purchase and possess firearms.

History of Section.

P.L. 1959, ch. 75, § 1; P.L. 1975, ch. 278, § 1; P.L. 2014, ch. 346, § 1; P.L. 2014, ch. 391, § 1.

11-47-7.
Possession of firearm by alien.

No unnaturalized foreign born person who entered the United States in violation of the laws of the United States or, having legally entered the United States in a lawful manner, but now remains in the United States in violation of the laws of the United States, shall purchase, own, carry, transport, or have in his or her possession or under his or her control any firearm.

When any person is charged under this section, the law enforcement agency bringing the charge shall, prior to arraignment, notify the United States Office of Immigration and Naturalization of the charge and further notify the court, at arraignment, of the alleged status of the person so charged.

History of Section.

P.L. 1959, ch. 75, § 1; P.L. 1983, ch. 300, § 1; P.L. 1996, ch. 146, § 1.

11-47-8.
License or permit required for carrying pistol — Other weapons prohibited.

No person shall, without a license or permit issued as provided in §§

11-47-11

,

11-47-12

, and

11-47-18

, carry a pistol or revolver in any vehicle or conveyance or on or about his or her person whether visible or concealed, except in his or her dwelling house or place of business or on land possessed by him or her or as provided in §§

11-47-9

and

11-47-10

. The provisions of these sections shall not apply to any person who is the holder of a valid license or permit issued by the licensing authority of another state, or territory of the United States, or political subdivision of the state or territory, allowing him or her to carry a pistol or revolver in any vehicle or conveyance or on or about his or her person whether visible or concealed, provided the person is merely transporting the firearm through the state in a vehicle or other conveyance without any intent on the part of the person to detain him or herself or remain within the state of Rhode Island. No person shall manufacture, sell, purchase, or possess a machine gun except as otherwise provided in this chapter. Every person violating the provision of this section shall, upon conviction, be punished by imprisonment for not less than one nor more than ten (10) years, or by a fine up to ten thousand dollars ($10,000), or both, and except for a first conviction under this section, shall not be afforded the provisions of suspension or deferment of sentence, nor a probation.

No person shall have in his or her possession or under his or her control any sawed-off shotgun or sawed-off rifle as defined in §

11-47-2

. Any person convicted of violating this subsection shall be punished by imprisonment for up to ten (10) years, or by a fine of up to five thousand dollars ($5,000), or both.

No person shall have in his or her possession or under his or her control any firearm while the person delivers, possesses with intent to deliver, or manufactures a controlled substance. Any person convicted of violating this subsection shall be punished by imprisonment for not less than two (2) years nor more than twenty (20) years, and the sentence shall be consecutive to any sentence the person may receive for the delivery, possession with intent to deliver, or the manufacture of the controlled substance. It shall not be a defense to a violation of this subsection that a person has a license or permit to carry or possess a firearm.

It shall be unlawful for any person to possess a bump-fire device, binary trigger, trigger crank, or any other device that when attached to a semi-automatic weapon allows full-automatic fire. Individuals who possess these items shall have ninety (90) days from the enactment of this section to either sell, destroy, or otherwise remove these items from the state of Rhode Island. Every person violating the provisions of this section shall, upon conviction, be punished by imprisonment for not less than one nor more than ten (10) years, or by a fine up to ten thousand dollars ($10,000), or both, and, except for a first conviction under this section, shall not be afforded the provisions of suspension or deferment of sentence, nor a probation.

No person shall manufacture, sell, offer to sell, transfer, purchase, possess, or have under his or her control a ghost gun or an undetectable firearm or any firearm produced by a 3D printing process. Any person convicted of violating this subsection shall be punished by imprisonment of not more than ten (10) years, or by a fine up to ten thousand dollars ($10,000), or both and except for a first conviction under this section shall not be afforded the provisions of suspension or deferment of sentence, probation, nor fine. These provisions shall not apply to federally licensed manufacturers (FLN) pursuant to Alcohol, Tobacco, Firearms, and Explosives (ATF) regulations.

History of Section.

P.L. 1927, ch. 1052, § 4; G.L. 1938, ch. 404, § 4; G.L. 1956, §

11-47-5

; G.L., §

11-47-8

; P.L. 1959, ch. 75, § 1; P.L. 1968, ch. 183, § 3; P.L. 1974, ch. 184, § 1; P.L. 1975, ch. 278, § 1; P.L. 1988, ch. 389, § 1; P.L. 1991, ch. 227, § 1; P.L. 1992, ch. 422, § 1; P.L. 1992, ch. 460, § 1; P.L. 2000, ch. 109, § 11; P.L. 2018, ch. 5, § 3; P.L. 2018, ch. 8, § 3; P.L. 2020, ch. 9, § 2; P.L. 2020, ch. 10, § 2.

11-47-8.1.
Modification of semi-automatic weapon.

It shall be unlawful for any person within this state to modify any semi-automatic weapon such that it can shoot, is designed to shoot, or can be readily restored to shoot full-automatic fire with a single pull or hold of the trigger. The possession of such a modified semi-automatic weapon shall be evidence of guilty knowledge by the person having possession that the semi-automatic weapon was modified. Every person violating the provisions of this subsection shall, upon conviction, be punished by imprisonment for not less than one year nor more than ten (10) years, or by a fine up to ten thousand dollars ($10,000), or both, and, except for a first conviction under this section, shall not be afforded the provisions of suspension or deferment of sentence, nor a probation.

This section shall not apply to the purchase of any such device by the Rhode Island state police, by any city or town police department of the state of Rhode Island, or by the department of environmental management for display as a part of a firearms training course under its auspices.

Weapons otherwise considered legal that are found modified by devices pursuant to this section shall be subject to forfeiture pursuant to §

11-47-22

.

This section shall not be construed to prohibit use of a replacement trigger or trigger components designed and intended to decrease the weight of the trigger pull or to improve the quality and release of the trigger pull in a semi-automatic weapon.

History of Section.

P.L. 2018, ch. 5, § 2; P.L. 2018, ch. 8, § 2.